Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated to the State Board  of Parole and Post-Prison Super-
vision, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount  of
$17,898,813.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other  law limiting expenditures, the amount of $13,229
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received  by the State Board of Parole
and Post-Prison Supervision.
SECTION 3.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
Enrolled House Bill 5027 (HB 5027-A) Page 1
Passed by House June 2, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 11, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5027 (HB 5027-A) Page 2